Nevada, session 83, SB92.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 686B.070 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686B.070 1. Every authorized insurer and every rate service
organization licensed under NRS 686B.140 which has been
designated by any insurer for the filing of rates under subsection 2
of NRS 686B.090 shall file with the Commissioner all:
(a) Rates and proposed increases thereto;
(b) Forms of policies to which the rates apply;
(c) Supplementary rate information; and
(d) Changes and amendments thereof,
 made by it for use in this state.
-
*SB92*

– 3 –
2. [A] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a filing
made pursuant to this section must include a proposed effective date
and must be filed not less than 30 days before that proposed
effective date, except that a filing for a proposed increase or
decrease in a rate for a health plan described in NRS 686B.112
may include a request that the Commissioner authorize an effective
date that is earlier than the proposed effective date.
3. A filing made pursuant to this section for a proposed
increase or decrease in a rate for any kind or line of insurance or
subdivision thereof, other than a health plan described in NRS
686B.112, must be filed on or before the proposed effective date
included in the filing. An insurer may implement the proposed
increase or decrease on the proposed effective date included in the
filing while the proposed increase or decrease is pending approval
or disapproval by the Commissioner pursuant to NRS 686B.110.
4. If an insurer makes a filing for a proposed increase in a rate
for insurance covering the liability of a practitioner licensed
pursuant to chapter 630, 631, 632 or 633 of NRS for a breach of the
practitioner’s professional duty toward a patient, the insurer shall
not include in the filing any component that is directly or indirectly
related to the following:
(a) Capital losses, diminished cash flow from any dividends,
interest or other investment returns, or any other financial loss that
is materially outside of the claims experience of the professional
liability insurance industry, as determined by the Commissioner.
(b) Losses that are the result of any criminal or fraudulent
activities of a director, officer or employee of the insurer.
 If the Commissioner determines that a filing includes any such
component, the Commissioner shall, pursuant to NRS 686B.110,
disapprove the proposed increase, in whole or in part, to the extent
that the proposed increase relies upon such a component.
[4.] 5. If an insurer makes a filing for a proposed increase in a
rate for a health benefit plan, as that term is defined in NRS
687B.470, the filing must include a unified rate review template, a
written description justifying the rate increase and any rate filing
documentation.
[5.] 6. As used in this section, “rate filing documentation,”
“unified rate review template” and “written description
justifying the rate increase” have the meanings ascribed in 45 C.F.R.
§ 154.215.
Sec. 2. NRS 686B.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
686B.100 1. By rule, the Commissioner may require the
filing of supporting data as to any or all kinds or lines of insurance
or subdivisions thereof or classes of risks or combinations thereof as
the Commissioner deems necessary for the proper functioning of the
-
*SB92*

– 4 –
process for monitoring and regulating rates. The supporting data
must include:
(a) The experience and judgment of the filer, and, to the extent it
wishes or the Commissioner requires, of other insurers or rate
service organizations;
(b) Its interpretation of any statistical data relied upon;
(c) Descriptions of the actuarial and statistical methods
employed in setting the rates; and
(d) Any other relevant matters required by the Commissioner.
2. [Whenever] Except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, whenever a filing of a proposed increase in a rate is not
accompanied by such information as the Commissioner has required
under subsection 1, the Commissioner may so inform the insurer
and the filing shall be deemed to be made when the information is
furnished. For the purposes of implementing a proposed increase
in a rate for any kind or line of insurance or subdivision thereof,
other than a health plan described in NRS 686B.112, pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 686B.070, the filing of such a proposed
increase shall be deemed to be made on the date on which it is
filed with the Commissioner, regardless of whether the filing is
accompanied by any information required by the Commissioner
pursuant to subsection 1.
Sec. 3. NRS 686B.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
686B.110 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 686B.112,
the Commissioner shall consider each proposed increase or decrease
in the rate of any kind or line of insurance or subdivision thereof
filed with the Commissioner pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS
686B.070. If the Commissioner finds that a proposed increase will
result in a rate which is not in compliance with NRS 686B.050 or
subsection [3] 4 of NRS 686B.070, the Commissioner shall
disapprove the proposal. The Commissioner shall approve or
disapprove each proposal no later than 30 days after it is determined
by the Commissioner to be complete pursuant to subsection 6. If the
Commissioner fails to approve or disapprove the proposal within
that period, the proposal shall be deemed approved.
2. If the Commissioner disapproves a proposed increase or
decrease in any rate pursuant to subsection 1, the Commissioner
shall send a written notice of disapproval to the insurer or the rate
service organization that filed the proposal. The notice must set
forth the reasons the proposal is not in compliance with NRS
686B.050 or subsection [3] 4 of NRS 686B.070 and must be sent to
the insurer or the rate service organization not more than 30 days
after the Commissioner determines that the proposal is complete
pursuant to subsection 6.
-
*SB92*

– 5 –
3. Upon receipt of a written notice of disapproval from the
Commissioner pursuant to subsection 2 or 6, the insurer or rate
service organization may request that the Commissioner reconsider
the proposed increase or decrease. The request for reconsideration
must be received by the Commissioner not more than 30 days after
the insurer or rate service organization receives the written notice of
disapproval from the Commissioner, except that if the insurer or rate
service organization requests, in writing, an extension of 30
additional days in which to request a reconsideration, the
Commissioner shall grant the extension. A request for
reconsideration submitted pursuant to this subsection may include,
without limitation, any documents or other information for review
by the Commissioner in reconsidering the proposal. The
Commissioner shall approve or disapprove the proposal upon
reconsideration not later than 30 days after receipt of the request for
reconsideration and shall notify the insurer or rate service
organization of his or her approval or disapproval.
4. Whenever an insurer has no legally effective rates as a result
of the Commissioner’s disapproval of rates or other act, the
Commissioner shall on request specify interim rates for the insurer
that are high enough to protect the interests of all parties and may
order that a specified portion of the premiums be placed in an
escrow account approved by the Commissioner. When new rates
become legally effective, the Commissioner shall order the
escrowed funds or any overcharge in the interim rates to be
distributed appropriately, except that refunds to policyholders that
are de minimis must not be required.
5. If the Commissioner disapproves a proposed rate pursuant to
subsection 1 or subsection 6 or upon reconsideration pursuant to
subsection 3 and an insurer requests a hearing to determine the
validity of the action of the Commissioner, the insurer has the
burden of showing compliance with the applicable standards for
rates established in NRS 686B.010 to 686B.1799, inclusive. Any
such hearing must be held:
(a) Within 30 days after the request for a hearing has been
submitted to the Commissioner; or
(b) Within a period agreed upon by the insurer and the
Commissioner.
 If the hearing is not held within the period specified in paragraph
(a) or (b), or if the Commissioner fails to issue an order concerning
the proposed rate for which the hearing is held within 45 days after
the hearing, the proposed rate shall be deemed approved.
6. The Commissioner shall by regulation specify the
documents or any other information which must be included in a
proposal to increase or decrease a rate submitted to the
-
*SB92*

– 6 –
Commissioner pursuant to subsection 1. Each such proposal shall be
deemed complete upon its filing with the Commissioner, unless the
Commissioner, within 15 business days after the proposal is filed
with the Commissioner, determines that the proposal is incomplete
because the proposal does not comply with the regulations adopted
by the Commissioner pursuant to this subsection. The
determination of the Commissioner that a proposal is incomplete
does not prohibit an insurer from implementing a proposed
increase or decrease in a rate pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS
686B.070. The Commissioner shall notify the insurer or rate service
organization if the Commissioner determines that the proposal is
incomplete. The notice must be sent within 15 business days after
the proposal is filed with the Commissioner and must set forth
the documents or other information that is required to complete the
proposal. The Commissioner may disapprove the proposal if the
insurer or rate service organization fails to provide the documents or
other information to the Commissioner within 30 days after
the insurer or rate service organization receives the notice that the
proposal is incomplete. If the Commissioner disapproves the
proposal pursuant to this subsection, the Commissioner shall notify
the insurer or rate service organization of that fact in writing.
7. If the Commissioner disapproves a proposed increase or
decrease in a rate pursuant to subsection 1 or 6, upon
reconsideration pursuant to subsection 3 or after a hearing
conducted pursuant to subsection 5 and the insurer has
implemented the proposed increase or decrease pending approval
or disapproval by the Commissioner pursuant to subsection 3 of
NRS 686B.070, the Commissioner shall issue a written order that
includes, without limitation, the specific reasons for the
disapproval, with citations to relevant statutes, and the date on
which the disapproved increased or decreased rate must no longer
be used for the issuance of new policies or contracts or the
renewal of existing policies or contracts. The date established by
the Commissioner must be not less than 90 days after the written
order is issued. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
the order does not affect any policy or contract made before the
effective date of the order. The Commissioner may require that the
premiums be adjusted after the effective date of the order for those
policies or contracts in effect on the effective date of the order.
Sec. 4. NRS 686B.112 is hereby amended to read as follows:
686B.112 1. The Commissioner shall perform an actuarial
review of and consider each rate filing of a health plan issued
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 689A, 689B, 689C, 695B,
695C, 695D or 695F of NRS, including, without limitation, long-
term care and Medicare supplement plans, filed with the
-
*SB92*

– 7 –
Commissioner pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 686B.070. If the
Commissioner finds that a proposed rate which is contained in a rate
filing will result in a rate which is not in compliance with NRS
686B.050 or subsection [3] 4 of NRS 686B.070, the Commissioner
shall disapprove the rate filing. The Commissioner shall approve or
disapprove each rate filing not later than 60 days after the rate filing
is determined by the Commissioner to be complete pursuant to
subsection 4. If the Commissioner fails to approve or disapprove the
rate filing within that period, the rate filing shall be deemed
approved.
2. Whenever an insurer has no legally effective rates as a result
of the Commissioner’s disapproval of rates or other act, the
Commissioner shall on request specify interim rates for the insurer
that are high enough to protect the interests of all parties and may
order that a specified portion of the premiums be placed in an
escrow account approved by the Commissioner. When new rates
become legally effective, the Commissioner shall order the
escrowed funds or any overcharge in the interim rates to be
distributed appropriately, except that refunds to policyholders that
are de minimis must not be required.
3. If the Commissioner disapproves a rate filing pursuant to
subsection 1, and an insurer requests a hearing to determine the
validity of the action of the Commissioner, the insurer has the
burden of showing compliance with the applicable standards for
rates established in NRS 686B.010 to 686B.1799, inclusive. Any
such hearing must be held:
(a) Within 30 days after the request for a hearing has been
submitted to the Commissioner; or
(b) Within a period agreed upon by the insurer and the
Commissioner.
 If the hearing is not held within the period specified in paragraph
(a) or (b), or if the Commissioner fails to issue an order concerning
the rate filing for which the hearing is held within 45 days after the
hearing, the rate filing shall be deemed approved.
4. The Commissioner shall by regulation specify the
documents or any other information which must be included in a
rate filing submitted to the Commissioner pursuant to subsection 1.
Each such rate filing shall be deemed complete upon its filing with
the Commissioner, unless the Commissioner, within 15 business
days after the rate filing is filed with the Commissioner, determines
that the rate filing is incomplete because the rate filing does not
comply with the regulations adopted by the Commissioner pursuant
to this subsection.
-
*SB92*

– 8 –
5. The Commissioner may assess against an insurer the actual
cost for the external actuarial review of a rate filing submitted
pursuant to subsection 1.
Sec. 5. NRS 686B.117 is hereby amended to read as follows:
686B.117 If a filing made with the Commissioner pursuant
to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 686B.070 pertains to
insurance covering the liability of a practitioner licensed pursuant to
chapter 630, 631, 632 or 633 of NRS for a breach of the
practitioner’s professional duty toward a patient, any interested
person, and any association of persons or organization whose
members may be affected, may intervene as a matter of right in any
hearing or other proceeding conducted to determine whether the
applicable rate or proposed increase thereto:
1. Complies with the standards set forth in NRS 686B.050 and
subsection [3] 4 of NRS 686B.070.
2. Should be approved or disapproved.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB92*